Washington statutes.
RCW 11.04.240

United States savings bond—Effect of beneficiary's survival of registered owner.

If the registered owner of United States savings bonds registered in the name of one person payable on death to another dies without having presented and surrendered the bond for payment or authorized reissue to a federal reserve bank or the treasury department, and is survived by the beneficiary, the beneficiary will be the sole and absolute owner of the bond.

[ 1965 c 145 s 11.04.240. Prior: 1943 c 14 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 11548-61.]